New Jersey, session 222, A716.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, an elementary or secondary school that is 12,000 square feet or larger shall be equipped with an automatic fire suppression system. 2.    The Commissioner of Education, in consultation with the Commissioner of Community Affairs, shall adopt pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act including rules that prioritize, at the discretion of the Commissioner of Education, elementary and secondary schools for the installation of automatic fire suppression systems. 3.    The State Treasurer, after consultation with the Commissioner of Education, shall have the authority to apply State funds otherwise available to State departments, agencies, and instrumentalities, including the proceeds of bonds issued by the New Jersey Economic Development Authority pursuant to section 14 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-14), for the purpose of securing compliance with the requirements established pursuant to this act. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.